Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Chapter 43. Administrative Procedures

§ 25-43-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-1. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1977, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§ 25-43-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-3. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 499, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1995), eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§ 25-43-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-5. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]

§ 25-43-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-7. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]

§ 25-43-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-9. [Laws 1976, ch. 487, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]

§ 25-43-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-11. [Law, 1976, ch. 487, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]

§ 25-43-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-13. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]

§ 25-43-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-13. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 8, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]

§ 25-43-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-17. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 9, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]

§ 25-43-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 304, § 26, effective July 1, 2005.

§25-43-19. [Laws, 1976, ch. 487, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1977.]